Illinois, session 104th, SB179.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-3-14 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-14)7    Sec. 3-3-14. Procedure for medical release.8    (a) Definitions.9        (1) As used in this Section, "medically incapacitated" 10    means that a petitioner an inmate has any diagnosable 11    medical condition, including dementia and severe, 12    permanent medical or cognitive disability, that prevents 13    the petitioner inmate from completing more than one 14    activity of daily living without assistance or that 15    incapacitates the petitioner inmate to the extent that 16    institutional confinement does not offer additional 17    restrictions, and that the condition is unlikely to 18    improve noticeably in the future.19        (2) As used in this Section, "terminal illness" means 20    a condition that satisfies all of the following criteria: 21            (i) the condition is irreversible and incurable; 22        and23            (ii) in accordance with medical standards and a   SB0179- 2 -LRB104 06325 RLC 16360 b1        reasonable degree of medical certainty, based on an 2        individual assessment of the petitioner inmate, the 3        condition is likely to cause death to the petitioner 4        inmate within 18 months. 5    (b) The Prisoner Review Board shall consider an 6application for compassionate release on behalf of any 7petitioner inmate who meets any of the following:8        (1) is suffering from a terminal illness; or9        (2) has been diagnosed with a condition that will 10    result in medical incapacity within the next 6 months; or11        (3) has become medically incapacitated subsequent to 12    sentencing due to illness or injury. 13    (c) Initial application. 14        (1) An initial application for medical release may be 15    filed with the Prisoner Review Board by the petitioner an 16    inmate, a prison official, a medical professional who has 17    treated or diagnosed the petitioner inmate, or the 18    petitioner's an inmate's spouse, parent, guardian, 19    grandparent, aunt or uncle, sibling, child over the age of 20    eighteen years, or attorney. If the initial application is 21    made by someone other than the petitioner inmate, the 22    petitioner inmate, or if the petitioner inmate is 23    medically unable to consent, the guardian or family member 24    designated to represent the petitioner's inmate's 25    interests must consent to the application at the time of 26    the institutional hearing.  SB0179- 3 -LRB104 06325 RLC 16360 b1        (2) Application materials shall be maintained on the 2    Prisoner Review Board's website and the Department of 3    Corrections' website and maintained in a clearly visible 4    place within the law library and the infirmary of every 5    penal institution and facility operated by the Department 6    of Corrections. 7        (3) The initial application need not be notarized, can 8    be sent via email or facsimile, and must contain the 9    following information: 10            (i) the petitioner's inmate's name and Illinois 11        Department of Corrections number;12            (ii) the petitioner's inmate's diagnosis;13            (iii) a statement that the petitioner inmate meets 14        one of the following diagnostic criteria: 15                (A) the petitioner inmate is suffering from a 16            terminal illness;17                (B) the petitioner inmate has been diagnosed 18            with a condition that will result in medical 19            incapacity within the next 6 months; or20                (C) the petitioner inmate has become medically 21            incapacitated subsequent to sentencing due to 22            illness or injury. 23        (3.5) The Prisoner Review Board shall place no 24    additional restrictions, limitations, or requirements on 25    applications from petitioners. 26        (4) Upon receiving the petitioner's inmate's initial   SB0179- 4 -LRB104 06325 RLC 16360 b1    application, the Board shall order the Department of 2    Corrections to have a physician or nurse practitioner 3    evaluate the petitioner inmate and create a written 4    evaluation within ten days of the Board's order. The 5    evaluation shall include but need not be limited to: 6            (i) a concise statement of the petitioner's 7        inmate's medical diagnosis, including prognosis, 8        likelihood of recovery, and primary symptoms, to 9        include incapacitation; and10            (ii) a statement confirming or denying that the 11        petitioner inmate meets one of the criteria stated in 12        subsection (b) of this Section. 13        (5) Upon a determination that the petitioner is 14    eligible for a hearing, the Prisoner Review Board shall:15            (i) provide public notice of the petitioner's 16        name, docket number, counsel, and hearing date; and17            (ii) provide a copy of the evaluation and any 18        medical records provided by the Department of 19        Corrections to the petitioner or the petitioner's 20        attorney upon scheduling the institutional hearing.21    (d) Institutional hearing. No public institutional hearing 22is required for consideration of a petition, but shall be 23granted at the request of the petitioner. Hearings are public 24unless the petitioner requests a non-public hearing. The 25petitioner has a right to attend the hearing and to speak on 26the petitioner's own behalf. The petitioner inmate may be   SB0179- 5 -LRB104 06325 RLC 16360 b1represented by counsel and may present witnesses to the Board 2members. Hearings shall be governed by the Open Parole 3Hearings Act. Members of the public shall be permitted to 4freely attend public hearings without restriction. 5    (e) Voting procedure. Petitions shall be considered by 6three-member panels, and decisions shall be made by simple 7majority. Voting shall take place during the public hearing. 8    (f) Consideration. In considering a petition for release 9under the statute, the Prisoner Review Board may consider the 10following factors: 11            (i) the petitioner's inmate's diagnosis and 12        likelihood of recovery;13            (ii) the approximate cost of health care to the 14        State should the petitioner inmate remain in custody;15            (iii) the impact that the petitioner's inmate's 16        continued incarceration may have on the provision of 17        medical care within the Department;18            (iv) the present likelihood of and ability to pose 19        a substantial danger to the physical safety of a 20        specifically identifiable person or persons;21            (v) any statements by the victim regarding 22        release; and23            (vi) whether the petitioner's inmate's condition 24        was explicitly disclosed to the original sentencing 25        judge and taken into account at the time of 26        sentencing.   SB0179- 6 -LRB104 06325 RLC 16360 b1    (f-1) Upon denying an eligible petitioner's application 2for medical release, the Prisoner Review Board shall publish a 3decision letter outlining the reason for denial. The decision 4letter must include an explanation of each statutory factor 5and the estimated annual cost of the petitioner's continued 6incarceration, including the petitioner's medical care. 7    (g) Petitioners Inmates granted medical release shall be 8released on mandatory supervised release for a period of 5 9years subject to Section 3-3-8, which shall operate to 10discharge any remaining term of years imposed upon him or her. 11However, in no event shall the eligible person serve a period 12of mandatory supervised release greater than the aggregate of 13the discharged underlying sentence and the mandatory 14supervised release period as set forth in Section 5-4.5-20.15    (h) Within 90 days of the receipt of the initial 16application, the Prisoner Review Board shall conduct a hearing 17if a hearing is requested and render a decision granting or 18denying the petitioner's request for release.19    (i) Nothing in this statute shall preclude a petitioner 20from seeking alternative forms of release, including clemency, 21relief from the sentencing court, post-conviction relief, or 22any other legal remedy.23    (j) This act applies retroactively, and shall be 24applicable to all currently incarcerated people in Illinois.25    (k) Data report. The Department of Corrections and the 26Prisoner Review Board shall release a report annually   SB0179- 7 -LRB104 06325 RLC 16360 b1published on their websites that reports the following 2information about the Medical Release Program:3        (1) The number of applications for medical release 4    received by the Board in the preceding year, and 5    information about those applications, including: 6            (i) demographic data about the petitioner 7        individual, including race or ethnicity, gender, age, 8        and institution;9            (ii) the highest class of offense for which the 10        petitioner individual is incarcerated;11            (iii) the relationship of the petitioner applicant 12        to the person completing the application;13            (iv) whether the petitioner applicant had applied 14        for medical release before and been denied, and, if 15        so, when;16            (v) whether the petitioner person applied as a 17        person who is medically incapacitated or a person who 18        is terminally ill; and19            (vi) a basic description of the underlying medical 20        condition that led to the application; and . 21            (vii) the institution in which the petitioner was 22        confined at the time of the application. 23        (2) The number of medical statements from the 24    Department of Corrections received by the Board.25        (3) The number of institutional hearings on medical 26    release applications conducted by the Board including: .  SB0179- 8 -LRB104 06325 RLC 16360 b1            (i) whether the petitioner was represented by an 2        attorney; and3            (ii) whether the application was considered in a 4        public or non-public hearing.5        (4) The number of people approved for medical release, 6    and information about them, including: 7            (i) demographic data about the individual 8        including race or ethnicity, gender, age, and zip code 9        to which they were released;10            (ii) whether the person applied as a person who is 11        medically incapacitated or a person who is terminally 12        ill;13            (iii) a basic description of the underlying 14        medical condition that led to the application; and15            (iv) a basic description of the medical setting 16        the person was released to; . 17            (v) whether the petitioner was represented by an 18        attorney; and19            (vi) whether the application was considered in a 20        public or non-public hearing. 21        (5) The number of people released on the medical 22    release program.23        (6) The number of people approved for medical release 24    who experienced more than a one-month delay between 25    release decision and ultimate release, including: 26            (i) demographic data about the individuals   SB0179- 9 -LRB104 06325 RLC 16360 b1        including race or ethnicity, gender and age;2            (ii) the reason for the delay;3            (iii) whether the person remains incarcerated; and4            (iv) a basic description of the underlying medical 5        condition of the applying person. 6        (7) For those individuals released on mandatory 7    supervised release due to a granted application for 8    medical release: 9            (i) the number of individuals who were serving 10        terms of mandatory supervised release because of 11        medical release applications during the previous year; 12            (ii) the number of individuals who had their 13        mandatory supervised release revoked; and14            (iii) the number of individuals who died during 15        the previous year. 16        (8) Information on seriously ill individuals 17    incarcerated at the Department of Corrections, including: 18            (i) the number of people currently receiving 19        full-time one-on-one medical care or assistance with 20        activities of daily living within Department of 21        Corrections facilities and whether that care is 22        provided by a medical practitioner or an incarcerated 23        person inmate, along with the institutions at which 24        they are incarcerated; and25            (ii) the number of people who spent more than one 26        month in outside hospital care during the previous   SB0179- 10 -LRB104 06325 RLC 16360 b1        year and their home institutions. 2    All the information provided in this report shall be 3provided in aggregate, and nothing shall be construed to 4require the public dissemination of any personal medical 5information. 6(Source: P.A. 102-494, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)